Utah statutes.
53A-1-602.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Basic skills course" means a subject which requires mastery of specific functions, as defined under rules made by the State Board of Education, to include reading, language arts, mathematics, science in grades 4 through 12, and effectiveness of written expression.

(2)  "Utah's common core" means the core set of English language arts and mathematics standards developed and adopted by the State Board of Education which define the knowledge and skills students should have in kindergarten through grade 12 to enable them to be prepared for college or workforce training.

(3)  "Utah Performance Assessment System for Students" or "U-PASS" means:

(a)  as determined by the State Board of Education, criterion-referenced achievement testing or online computer adaptive testing of students in grades 3 through 12 in basic skills courses;

(b)  an online writing assessment in grades 5 and 8;

(c)  a tenth grade basic skills competency test as detailed in Section 53A-1-611;

(d)  the use of student behavior indicators in assessing student performance; and

(e)  testing of students in grade 3 to measure reading grade level.



Amended by Chapter 394, 2012 General Session

